Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9048. EL PASO COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 4

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9048.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the El Paso County Water Control and Improvement District No. 4.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 9048.002. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) Except for property owned by a railroad or public utility that does not use the facilities of the district, all land included in the boundaries of the district will be benefited.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 9048.003. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 268, Acts of the 82nd Legislature, Regular Session, 2011, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on the bond;

(3) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9048.051. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the district has all the rights, powers, privileges, and duties, including the control of storm and flood waters, provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 9048.052. POWERS RELATING TO SANITARY SEWER SYSTEM. The district may construct, maintain, and operate a sanitary sewer system.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. BONDS

Sec. 9048.101. BOND ELECTION REQUIRED. The district may not issue bonds unless the bonds are authorized by a majority of the voters of the district voting at an election held for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2019.